North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 37. The Public Defender. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-465 through 7A-467.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-144, s. 13, as amended by Session Laws 2001-424, s. 22.11(c), effective July 1, 2001.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

§ 7A-468.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987 (Regular Session, 1988), c. 1056, s. 13.

§§ 7A-469 through 7A-471.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-144, s. 13, as amended by Session Laws 2001-424, s. 22.11(c), effective July 1, 2001.

§§ 7A-472 through 7A-474.

Reserved for future codification purposes.